Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE J. PHARMACY AND PHARMACISTS

CHAPTER 557. PHARMACIST-INTERNS

Sec. 557.001. PHARMACIST-INTERN REGISTRATION. A person must register with the board before beginning a board-approved internship in this state.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 557.002. APPLICATION FOR REGISTRATION. An application for registration as a pharmacist-intern must be on a form prescribed by the board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 557.003. DURATION OF REGISTRATION. A person's registration as a pharmacist-intern remains in effect as long as the person meets the qualifications for an internship specified by board rule.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 557.004. LIMITATIONS ON REGISTRATION. (a) The board may:

(1) refuse to issue a registration to an applicant; or

(2) restrict, suspend, or revoke a pharmacist-intern registration for a violation of this subtitle.

(b) The board may take disciplinary action against an applicant for a pharmacist-intern registration or the holder of a current or expired pharmacist-intern registration in the same manner as against an applicant for a license or a license holder by imposing a sanction authorized under Section 565.051 if the board finds that the applicant or registration holder has engaged in conduct described by Section 565.001.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 8, eff. June 14, 2013.